Washington statutes.
RCW 36.09.035

Procedure to settle amount charged new county—Disagreement between auditors—Determination by third person.

In case the two auditors cannot agree, they shall call a third person, not a citizen of either county, or in any other manner interested, whose decision shall be binding. In case they cannot agree upon such third person, they shall each name one and decide by lot which it shall be.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.09.035. Prior: Code 1881 s 2659; 1863 p 539 s 5; 1854 p 330 s 3; RRS s 3988.]